Rhode Island, session 2025, SB276.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 45-24-30, 45-24-31, 45-24-33, 45-24-34, 45-24-36, 45-24-37, 45-
24-39, 45-24-40, 45-24-43, 45-24-44, 45-24-46.1, 45-24-46.2, 45-24-46.3, 45-24-47 and 45-24-48
of the General Laws in Chapter 45-24 entitled "Zoning Ordinances" are hereby amended to read as
follows:
45-24-30. General purposes of zoning ordinances.
(a) Zoning regulations shall be developed and maintained in accordance with a
comprehensive plan prepared, adopted, and as may be amended, in accordance with chapter 22.2
of this title and shall be designed to address the following purposes. The general assembly
recognizes these purposes, each with equal priority and numbered for reference purposes only.
(1) Respecting the right of housing for every Rhode Islander in any city or town, regardless
of their income.
(1)(2) Promoting the public health, safety, and general welfare.
(2)(3) Providing for a range of uses and intensities of use appropriate to the character of
the city or town and reflecting current and expected future needs.
(4) Promoting smart growth, redevelopment of previously developed land and preservation
of undeveloped land.
(3)(5) Providing for orderly growth, and development and redevelopment that recognizes:
(i) The goals and patterns of land use contained in the comprehensive plan of the city or

town adopted pursuant to chapter 22.2 of this title;
(ii) The natural characteristics of the land, including its suitability for use based on soil
characteristics, topography, and susceptibility to surface or groundwater pollution;
(iii) The values and dynamic nature of coastal and freshwater ponds, the shoreline, and
freshwater and coastal wetlands;
(iv) The values of unique or valuable natural resources and features;
(v) The availability and capacity of existing and planned public and/or private services and
facilities, specifically public and civic spaces, transportation, water, storm water management
systems, sewage treatment and disposal, solid waste treatment and disposal, schools, recreation,
public facilities, open space, and other public requirements;
(vi) The need to shape and balance urban and rural development; and
(vii) The use of innovative development, and redevelopment regulations and techniques.
(4)(6) Providing for the control, protection, and/or abatement of air, water, groundwater,
and noise pollution, and soil erosion and sedimentation.
(5)(7) Providing for the protection of the natural, historic, cultural, and scenic character
characteristics of the city or town or areas in the municipality.
(6)(8) Providing for the preservation and promotion of agricultural production, forest,
silviculture, aquaculture, timber resources, public and civic spaces, and open space.
(7)(9) Providing for the protection of public investment in transportation, public and civic
spaces, water, stormwater management systems, sewage treatment and disposal, solid waste
treatment and disposal, schools, recreation, public facilities, open space, and other public
requirements.
(8)(10) Promoting a balance of housing choices, for all income levels and groups, to assure
the health, safety, and welfare of all citizens and their rights to affordable, accessible, safe, and
sanitary housing.
(9)(11) Providing opportunities for the establishment of low- and moderate-income
housing.
(10)(12) Promoting safety from fire, flood, and other natural or unnatural disasters wildfire.
(11)(13) Promoting a high level of quality in design and construction in the development
and redevelopment of private and public facilities.
(12)(14) Promoting implementation of the comprehensive plan of the city or town adopted
pursuant to chapter 22.2 of this title.
(13)(15) Providing for coordination of land uses with contiguous municipalities, other
municipalities, the state, and other agencies, as appropriate, especially with regard to resources and
LC000266 - Page 2 of 29

facilities that extend beyond municipal boundaries or have a direct impact on that municipality.
(14)(16) Providing for efficient review of development and redevelopment proposals, to
clarify and expedite the zoning approval process.
(15)(17) Providing for procedures for the administration of the zoning ordinance,
including, but not limited to, variances, special-use permits, and, where adopted, procedures for
modifications.
(16)(18) Providing opportunities for reasonable accommodations in order to comply with
the Rhode Island Fair Housing Practices Act, chapter 37 of title 34; the United States Fair Housing
Amendments Act of 1988 (FHAA); the Rhode Island Civil Rights of Persons with Disabilities Act,
chapter 87 of title 42; and the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA), 42 U.S.C. § 12101
et seq.
Provided, however, that any zoning ordinance in which a community sets forth standards
or requirements for the location, design, construction, or maintenance of on-site wastewater
treatment systems shall first be submitted to the director of the department of environmental
management for approval as to the technical merits of the ordinance. In addition, any zoning
ordinance in which a municipality sets forth standards regarding wetland requirements, shall first
be submitted to the director of the department of environmental management for approval as to the
technical merits of the ordinance.
(b) Upon the effective date of this section, a city or town shall no longer be authorized to
adopt as a provision of its zoning ordinance new requirements that specify buffers or setbacks in
relation to freshwater wetland, freshwater wetland in the vicinity of the coast, or coastal wetland or
that specify setback distances between an onsite wastewater treatment system and a freshwater
wetlands, freshwater wetland in the vicinity of the coast, or coastal wetland.
(c) Cities and towns shall be prohibited from applying the requirements in existing zoning
ordinances pertaining to both wetland buffers and onsite wastewater treatment system setbacks to
development, redevelopment, construction, or rehabilitation applications submitted to a
municipality. Nothing herein shall rescind the authority of a city or town to enforce other local
zoning requirements.
(d) Cities and towns shall act to amend their ordinances and regulations to conform to this
section within twelve (12) months of the effective date of state regulations referenced herein.
45-24-31. Definitions.
Where words or terms used in this chapter are defined in § 45-22.2-4 or § 45-23-32, they
have the meanings stated in that section. In addition, the following words have the following
meanings. Additional words and phrases may be used in developing local ordinances under this
LC000266 - Page 3 of 29

chapter; however, the words and phrases defined in this section are controlling in all local
ordinances created under this chapter:
(1) Abutter. One whose property abuts, that is, adjoins at a border, boundary, or point with
no intervening land.
(2) Accessory dwelling unit (ADU). A residential living unit on the same lot where the
principal use is a legally established single-family dwelling unit or multi-family dwelling unit. An
ADU provides complete independent living facilities for one or more persons. It may take various
forms including, but not limited to: a detached unit; a unit that is part of an accessory structure,
such as a detached garage; or a unit that is part of an expanded or remodeled primary dwelling.
(3) Accessory use. A use of land or of a building, or portion thereof, customarily incidental
and subordinate to the principal use of the land or building. An accessory use may be restricted to
the same lot as the principal use. An accessory use shall not be permitted without the principal use
to which it is related.
(4) Adaptive reuse. “Adaptive reuse,” as defined in § 42-64.22-2.
(5) Aggrieved party. An aggrieved party, for purposes of this chapter, shall be:
(i) Any person, or persons, or entity, or entities, who or that can demonstrate that his, her,
or its property will be injured by a decision of any officer or agency responsible for administering
the zoning ordinance of a city or town; or
(ii) Anyone requiring notice pursuant to this chapter.
(6) Agricultural land. “Agricultural land,” as defined in § 45-22.2-4.
(7) Airport hazard area. “Airport hazard area,” as defined in § 1-3-2.
(8) Applicant. An owner, or authorized agent of the owner, submitting an application or
appealing an action of any official, board, or agency.
(9) Application. The completed form, or forms, and all accompanying documents, exhibits,
and fees required of an applicant by an approving authority for development review, approval, or
permitting purposes.
(10) Architectural form. The shape or configuration of a building. Form and its opposite,
space, constitute primary elements of architecture. The form of a group of buildings, such as part
of a street wall, may include several buildings on separate lots owned by separate owners.
(11) Architectural wall. The vertical plane created by a series of architectural forms. See
also "street wall."
(10)(12) Buffer. Land that is maintained in either a natural or landscaped state, and is used
to screen or mitigate the impacts of development on surrounding areas, properties, or rights-of-
way.
LC000266 - Page 4 of 29

(11)(13) Building. Any structure used or intended for supporting or sheltering any use or
occupancy.
(12)(14) Building envelope. The three-dimensional space within which a structure is
permitted to be built on a lot and that is defined by regulations governing building setbacks,
maximum height, and bulk; by other regulations; or by any combination thereof.
(13)(15) Building height. For a vacant parcel of land, building height shall be measured
from the average, existing-grade elevation where the foundation of the structure is proposed. For
an existing structure, building height shall be measured from average grade taken from the
outermost four (4) corners of the existing foundation. In all cases, building height shall be measured
to the top of the highest point of the existing or proposed roof or structure. This distance shall
exclude spires, chimneys, flag poles, and the like. For any property or structure located in a special
flood hazard area, as shown on the official FEMA Flood Insurance Rate Maps (FIRMs), or depicted
on the Rhode Island coastal resources management council (CRMC) suggested design elevation
three foot (3′) sea level rise (CRMC SDE 3 SLR) map as being inundated during a one-hundred-
year (100) storm, the greater of the following amounts, expressed in feet, shall be excluded from
the building height calculation:
(i) The base flood elevation on the FEMA FIRM plus up to five feet (5′) of any utilized or
proposed freeboard, less the average existing grade elevation; or
(ii) The suggested design elevation as depicted on the CRMC SDE 3 SLR map during a
one-hundred-year (100) storm, less the average existing grade elevation. CRMC shall reevaluate
the appropriate suggested design elevation map for the exclusion every ten (10) years, or as
otherwise necessary.
(16) Civic space. See "public and civic space".
(14)(17) Cluster. A site-planning technique that concentrates buildings in specific areas on
the site to allow the remaining land to be used for public and civic space, recreation, common open
space, and/or preservation of environmentally, historically, culturally, or other sensitive features
and/or structures. The techniques used to concentrate buildings shall be specified in the ordinance
and may include, but are not limited to, reduction in lot areas, setback requirements, and/or bulk
requirements, with the resultant open land being devoted by deed restrictions for one or more uses.
Under cluster development, there is no increase in the number of lots that would be permitted under
conventional development except where ordinance provisions include incentive bonuses for certain
types or conditions of development.
(15)(18) Common ownership. Either:
(i) Ownership by one or more individuals or entities in any form of ownership of two (2)
LC000266 - Page 5 of 29

or more contiguous lots; or
(ii) Ownership by any association (ownership may also include a municipality) of one or
more lots under specific development techniques.
(16)(19) Community residence. A home or residential facility where children and/or adults
reside in a family setting and may or may not receive supervised care. This does not include halfway
houses or substance-use-disorder-treatment facilities. This does include, but is not limited to, the
following:
(i) Whenever six (6) or fewer children or adults with intellectual and/or developmental
disability reside in any type of residence in the community, as licensed by the state pursuant to
chapter 24 of title 40.1. All requirements pertaining to local zoning are waived for these community
residences;
(ii) A group home providing care or supervision, or both, to not more than eight (8) persons
with disabilities, and licensed by the state pursuant to chapter 24 of title 40.1;
(iii) A residence for children providing care or supervision, or both, to not more than eight
(8) children, including those of the caregiver, and licensed by the state pursuant to chapter 72.1 of
title 42;
(iv) A community transitional residence providing care or assistance, or both, to no more
than six (6) unrelated persons or no more than three (3) families, not to exceed a total of eight (8)
persons, requiring temporary financial assistance, and/or to persons who are victims of crimes,
abuse, or neglect, and who are expected to reside in that residence not less than sixty (60) days nor
more than two (2) years. Residents will have access to, and use of, all common areas, including
eating areas and living rooms, and will receive appropriate social services for the purpose of
fostering independence, self-sufficiency, and eventual transition to a permanent living situation.
(17)(20) Comprehensive plan. The comprehensive plan adopted and approved pursuant to
chapter 22.2 of this title and to which any zoning adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be in
compliance.
(18)(21) Day care — Daycare center. Any other daycare center that is not a family daycare
home.
(19)(22) Day care — Family daycare home. Any home, other than the individual’s home,
in which day care in lieu of parental care or supervision is offered at the same time to six (6) or less
individuals who are not relatives of the caregiver, but may not contain more than a total of eight
(8) individuals receiving day care.
(20)(23) Density, residential. The number of dwelling units per unit of land.
(21)(24) Development. The construction, reconstruction, conversion, façade redesign,
LC000266 - Page 6 of 29

structural alteration, relocation, or enlargement of any structure; any mining, excavation, landfill,
or land disturbance; or any change in use, or alteration or extension of the use, of land.
(22)(25) Development plan review. See §§ 45-23-32 and 45-23-50.
(23)(26) District. See “zoning use and form district.”
(24)(27) Drainage system. A system for the removal of water from land by drains, grading,
or other appropriate means. These techniques may include runoff controls to minimize erosion and
sedimentation during and after construction or development; the means for preserving surface and
groundwaters; and the prevention and/or alleviation of flooding.
(25)(28) Dwelling unit. A structure, or portion of a structure, providing complete,
independent living facilities for one or more persons, including permanent provisions for living,
sleeping, eating, cooking, and sanitation, and containing a separate means of ingress and egress.
(26)(29) Extractive industry. The extraction of minerals, including: solids, such as coal and
ores; liquids, such as crude petroleum; and gases, such as natural gases. The term also includes
quarrying; well operation; milling, such as crushing, screening, washing, and flotation; and other
preparation customarily done at the extraction site or as a part of the extractive activity.
(27)(30) Family member. A person, or persons, related by blood, marriage, or other legal
means, including, but not limited to, a child, parent, spouse, mother-in-law, father-in-law,
grandparents, grandchildren, domestic partner, sibling, care recipient, or member of the household.
(28)(31) Floating zone. An unmapped zoning district adopted within the ordinance that is
established on the zoning map only when an application for development, meeting the zone
requirements, is approved.
(29)(32) Floodplains, or Flood hazard area. As defined in § 45-22.2-4.
(33) Form. See "architectural form."
(30)(34) Freeboard. A factor of safety expressed in feet above the base flood elevation of
a flood hazard area for purposes of floodplain management. Freeboard compensates for the many
unknown factors that could contribute to flood heights, such as wave action, bridge openings, and
the hydrological effect of urbanization of the watershed.
(31)(35) Groundwater. “Groundwater” and associated terms, as defined in § 46-13.1-3.
(32)(36) Halfway house. A residential facility for adults or children who have been
institutionalized for criminal conduct and who require a group setting to facilitate the transition to
a functional member of society.
(33)(37) Hardship. See § 45-24-41.
(34)(38) Historic district or historic site. As defined in § 45-22.2-4.
(35)(39) Home occupation. Any activity customarily carried out for gain by a resident,
LC000266 - Page 7 of 29

conducted as an accessory use in the resident’s dwelling unit.
(36)(40) Household. One or more persons living together in a single-dwelling unit, with
common access to, and common use of, all living and eating areas and all areas and facilities for
the preparation and storage of food within the dwelling unit. The term “household unit” is
synonymous with the term “dwelling unit” for determining the number of units allowed within any
structure on any lot in a zoning district. An individual household shall consist of any one of the
following:
(i) A family, which may also include servants and employees living with the family; or
(ii) A person or group of unrelated persons living together. The maximum number may be
set by local ordinance, but this maximum shall not be less than one person per bedroom and shall
not exceed five (5) unrelated persons per dwelling. The maximum number shall not apply to
NARR-certified recovery residences.
(37)(41) Incentive zoning. The process whereby the local authority may grant additional
development capacity in exchange for the developer’s provision of a public benefit or amenity as
specified in local ordinances.
(38)(42) Infrastructure. Facilities and services needed to sustain residential, commercial,
industrial, institutional, and other activities.
(39)(43) Land development project. As defined in § 45-23-32.
(40)(44) Lot. Either:
(i) The basic development unit for determination of lot area, depth, and other dimensional
regulations; or
(ii) A parcel of land whose boundaries have been established by some legal instrument,
such as a recorded deed or recorded map, and that is recognized as a separate legal entity for
purposes of transfer of title.
(41)(45) Lot area. The total area within the boundaries of a lot, excluding any street right-
of-way, usually reported in acres or square feet.
(42)(46) Lot area, minimum. The smallest land area established by the local zoning
ordinance upon which a use, building, or structure may be located in a particular zoning district.
(43)(47) Lot building coverage. That portion of the lot that is, or may be, covered by
buildings and accessory buildings.
(44)(48) Lot depth. The distance measured from the front lot line to the rear lot line. For
lots where the front and rear lot lines are not parallel, the lot depth is an average of the depth.
(45)(49) Lot frontage. That portion of a lot abutting a street. A zoning ordinance shall
specify how noncontiguous frontage will be considered with regard to minimum frontage
LC000266 - Page 8 of 29

requirements.
(46)(50) Lot line. A line of record, bounding a lot, that divides one lot from another lot or
from a public or private street or any other public or private space and shall include:
(i) Front: the lot line separating a lot from a street right-of-way. A zoning ordinance shall
specify the method to be used to determine the front lot line on lots fronting on more than one
street, for example, corner and through lots;
(ii) Rear: the lot line opposite and most distant from the front lot line, or in the case of
triangular or otherwise irregularly shaped lots, an assumed line at least ten feet (10′) in length
entirely within the lot, parallel to and at a maximum distance from, the front lot line; and
(iii) Side: any lot line other than a front or rear lot line. On a corner lot, a side lot line may
be a street lot line, depending on requirements of the local zoning ordinance.
(47)(51) Lot size, minimum. Shall have the same meaning as “minimum lot area” defined
herein.
(48)(52) Lot, through. A lot that fronts upon two (2) parallel streets, or that fronts upon two
(2) streets that do not intersect at the boundaries of the lot.
(49)(53) Lot width. The horizontal distance between the side lines of a lot measured at right
angles to its depth along a straight line parallel to the front lot line at the minimum front setback
line.
(50)(54) Manufactured home. As used in this section, a manufactured home shall have the
same definition as in 42 U.S.C. § 5402, meaning a structure, transportable in one or more sections,
which, in the traveling mode, is eight (8) body feet or more in width or forty (40) body feet or more
in length, or, when erected on site, is three hundred twenty (320) or more square feet, and which is
built on a permanent chassis and designed to be used as a dwelling with a permanent foundation
connected to the required utilities, and includes the plumbing, heating, air-conditioning, and
electrical systems contained therein; except that such term shall include any structure that meets
all the requirements of this definition except the size requirements and with respect to which the
manufacturer voluntarily files a certification required by the United States Secretary of Housing
and Urban Development and complies with the standards established under chapter 70 of Title 42
of the United States Code; and except that such term shall not include any self-propelled
recreational vehicle.
(51)(55) Mere inconvenience. See § 45-24-41.
(52)(56) Mixed use. A mixture of land uses within a single development, building, or tract.
Also referred to as traditional development. Typically ground floor commercial with residential
above.
LC000266 - Page 9 of 29

(53)(57) Modification. Permission granted and administered by the zoning enforcement
officer of the city or town, and pursuant to the provisions of this chapter to grant a dimensional
variance other than lot area requirements from the zoning ordinance to a limited degree as
determined by the zoning ordinance of the city or town, but not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%)
of each of the applicable dimensional requirements.
(54)(58) Nonconformance. A building, structure, or parcel of land, or use thereof, lawfully
existing at the time of the adoption or amendment of a zoning ordinance or in existence for at least
six (6) years and not in conformity with the provisions of that ordinance or amendment.
Nonconformance is of only two (2) types:
(i) Nonconforming by use: a lawfully established use of land, building, or structure that is
not a permitted use in that zoning district. A building or structure containing more dwelling units
than are permitted by the use regulations of a zoning ordinance is nonconformity by use; or
nonconforming by use. Nonconforming by use shall be established if a use was lawfully existing
prior to the enactment of the zoning ordinance or amendment that rendered the use out of
conformity; if a use has been in existence for fifty (50) years; or if a non-accessory use has been in
existence for twenty-five (25) years without the initiation of any enforcement actions to ensure
conformity with the zoning ordinance. In the case where the nonconformance by use exists because
the number of dwelling units exceeds the limits established by the use regulations of a zoning
ordinance, the nonconformance shall be established if the dwelling units were lawfully existing
prior to the enactment of a zoning ordinance or a zoning amendment that rendered the use out of
conformity; if the dwelling units were in existence prior to January 1, 2018; if the dwelling units
have been in existence for twenty-five (25) years; or if the dwelling units have been in existence
for six (6) years without the initiation of any enforcement actions to ensure conformity with the
zoning ordinance. In the case where the use is a zoning use that raises pollution risk,
nonconformance by use shall only be established if the zoning use that raises pollution risk was
lawfully existing for at least six (6) years prior to the enactment of the zoning ordinance or
amendment that rendered the zoning use that raises pollution risk out of conformity.
(ii) Nonconforming by dimension: a building, structure, or parcel of land not in compliance
with the dimensional regulations of the zoning ordinance. Dimensional regulations include all
regulations of the zoning ordinance, other than those pertaining to the permitted uses. A building
or structure containing more dwelling units than are permitted by the use regulations of a zoning
ordinance is nonconforming by use; a building or structure containing a permitted number of
dwelling units by the use regulations of the zoning ordinance, but not meeting the lot area per
dwelling unit regulations, is nonconforming by dimension.
LC000266 - Page 10 of 29

Nonconformance by dimension shall be established if the dimensional conditions were
lawfully existing prior to the enactment of the zoning ordinance or amendment that rendered the
building, structure, or parcel of land out of conformity; if the dimensional conditions were in
existence prior to January 1, 2018; if the dimensional conditions have been in existence for twenty
five (25) years; or if the dimensional conditions have been in existence for six (6) years without the
initiation of any enforcement actions to ensure conformity with the zoning ordinance.
(55)(59) Overlay district. A district established in a zoning ordinance that is superimposed
on one or more districts or parts of districts. The standards and requirements associated with an
overlay district may be more or less restrictive than those in the underlying districts consistent with
other applicable state and federal laws.
(56)(60) Performance standards. A set of criteria or limits relating to elements that a
particular use or process must either meet or may not exceed.
(57)(61) Permitted use. A use by right that is specifically authorized in a particular zoning
district.
(58)(62) Planned development. A “land development project,” as defined in subsection
(39) (43), and developed according to plan as a single entity and containing one or more structures
or uses with appurtenant common areas.
(59)(63) Plant agriculture. The growing of plants for food or fiber, to sell or consume.
(60)(64) Preapplication conference. A review meeting of a proposed development held
between applicants and reviewing agencies as permitted by law and municipal ordinance, before
formal submission of an application for a permit or for development approval.
(65) Public and civic space. An extension of the community, serving as a stage for our
public lives. The space enriches the lives of its users and enhances its surrounding buildings and
neighborhood. Public and civic space includes atria, boardwalks, courtyards, forecourts, overlooks,
plazas, paths, and squares.
(66) Reconstruction. The act or process of depicting, by means of new construction, the
form features, and detailing of a non-surviving site, landscape, building, structure, or object for the
purpose of replicating its appearance at a specific period of time and in its historic location.
(67) Redevelopment. Alteration to previously developed land, structures, or buildings
which may include adaptive reuse, reconstruction, conversion, facade redesign, structural
alteration, relocation, or enlargement of any structure or building.
(68) Rural. Sparsely populated and lacking in public services. Primarily open space and
agriculture with interstitial development.
(61)(69) Setback line or lines. A line, or lines, parallel to a lot line at the minimum distance
LC000266 - Page 11 of 29

of the required setback for the zoning district in which the lot is located that establishes the area
within which the principal structure must be erected or placed.
(62)(70) Site plan. The development plan for one or more lots on which is shown the
existing and/or the proposed conditions of the lot.
(63)(71) Slope of land. The grade, pitch, rise, or incline of the topographic landform or
surface of the ground.
(64)(72) Special use. A regulated use that is permitted pursuant to the special-use permit
issued by the authorized governmental entity, pursuant to § 45-24-42. Formerly referred to as a
special exception.
(73) Street wall. The architectural wall on either side of a street. A street wall requires
relatively consistent setbacks, building heights, building envelopes, and landscaping to function.
(65)(74) Structure. A combination of materials to form a construction for use, occupancy,
or ornamentation, whether installed on, above, or below the surface of land or water.
(66)(75) Substandard lot of record. Any lot lawfully existing at the time of adoption or
amendment of a zoning ordinance and not in conformance with the dimensional or area provisions
of that ordinance.
(76) Urban. Densely populated with defined and balanced public and private realms,
primarily with public and civic spaces, people-centric design, continuous, coherent, and
harmonious architectural wall, extensive public services, including transportation, water,
stormwater management systems, sewage treatment and disposal, solid waste treatment and
disposal, schools, recreation, public facilities, interstitial open space and agriculture, and other
public requirements. Generally defined by the division of planning as village centers and areas
within the urban services boundary, on a map maintained by the division of planning.
(67)(77) Use. The purpose or activity for which land or buildings are designed, arranged,
or intended, or for which land or buildings are occupied or maintained.
(68)(78) Variance. Permission to depart from the literal requirements of a zoning
ordinance. An authorization for the construction or maintenance of a building or structure, or for
the establishment or maintenance of a use of land, that is prohibited by a zoning ordinance. There
are only two (2) categories of variance, a use variance or a dimensional variance.
(i) Use variance. Permission to depart from the use requirements of a zoning ordinance
where the applicant for the requested variance has shown by evidence upon the record that the
subject land or structure cannot yield any beneficial use if it is to conform to the provisions of the
zoning ordinance.
(ii) Dimensional variance. Permission to depart from the dimensional requirements of a
LC000266 - Page 12 of 29

zoning ordinance under the applicable standards set forth in § 45-24-41.
(69)(79) Waters. As defined in § 46-12-1(23).
(70)(80) Wetland, coastal. As defined in § 45-22.2-4.
(71)(81) Wetland, freshwater. As defined in § 2-1-20.
(72)(82) Zoning certificate. A document signed by the zoning enforcement officer, as
required in the zoning ordinance, that acknowledges that a use, structure, building, or lot either
complies with, or is legally nonconforming to, the provisions of the municipal zoning ordinance or
is an authorized variance or modification therefrom.
(73)(83) Zoning map. The map, or maps, that are a part of the zoning ordinance and that
delineate the boundaries of all mapped zoning districts within the physical boundary of the city or
town.
(74)(84) Zoning ordinance. An ordinance enacted by the legislative body of the city or
town pursuant to this chapter and in the manner providing for the adoption of ordinances in the city
or town’s legislative or home rule charter, if any, that establish regulations and standards relating
to the nature and extent of uses of land and structures; that is consistent with the comprehensive
plan of the city or town as defined in chapter 22.2 of this title; that includes a zoning map; and that
complies with the provisions of this chapter.
(75)(85) Zoning use and form district. The basic unit in zoning, either mapped or
unmapped, to which a uniform set of regulations applies, or a uniform set of regulations for a
specified use. Zoning use and form districts include, but are not limited to: agricultural,
commercial, industrial, institutional, mixed use, open space, and residential, as well as urban core,
urban center, general urban, inner suburban, outer suburban, exurban, and rural. Each district may
include sub-districts. Districts may be combined.
(86) Zoning use that raises pollution risk. A use that raises potential for residents and
visitors of the surrounding area to experience the negative effects of air, groundwater, stormwater,
smell, auditory, or vibrational activities associated with the primary or accessory use of the subject
property. The following uses shall be included: animal care facility, nightclub, broadcasting
facility, car wash, drive-through facility, parking facility, asphalt surfaces, freight terminal, funeral
home, gas station, golf course, plant nursery, commercial agriculture, marina, boat construction
and repair, brewery, distillery, winery, power plant, strip mall, motorized vehicle repair, and all
industrial uses. The division of planning shall have the power to establish rules and regulations that
identify additional uses that meet these criteria.
45-24-33. Standard provisions.
(a) A zoning ordinance shall address each of the purposes stated in § 45-24-30 and shall
LC000266 - Page 13 of 29

address, through reasonable objective standards and criteria, the following general provisions
which are numbered for reference purposes only except as prohibited by § 45-24-30(b), § 45-24-
30(c), or § 45-24-30(d):
(1) Permitting, prohibiting, limiting, and restricting the development and redevelopment of
land and structures in zoning districts, and regulating those land and structures according to their
type and the nature and extent of their use;
(2) Regulating the nature and extent of the use of land for residential, commercial,
industrial, institutional, recreational, agricultural, open space, or other use or combination of uses,
as the need for land for those purposes is determined by the city or town’s comprehensive plan;
(3) Permitting, prohibiting, limiting, and restricting buildings, structures, land uses, and
other development and redevelopment by performance standards, or other requirements, related to
air and water and groundwater quality, noise and glare, energy consumption, soil erosion and
sedimentation, and/or the availability and capacity of existing and planned public or private
services, specifically transportation, water, stormwater management systems, sewage treatment and
disposal, solid waste treatment and disposal, schools, recreation, public facilities, open space, and
other public requirements;
(4) Regulating within each district and designating requirements for:
(i) The height, number of stories, and size, fenestration, and proportions of buildings;
(ii) The dimensions, size, lot coverage, and layout of lots or development areas and floor
area ratios provided that zoning ordinances must exclude any portion of a basement as defined in
§ 45-24.3-5 from the calculation of floor area ratio;
(iii) The density and intensity of use;
(iv) Access to air and light, views, and solar access;
(v) Open space, yards, courts, and buffers;
(vi) Parking areas, road design, and, where appropriate, pedestrian, bicycle, and other
circulator systems;
(vii) Landscaping, fencing, and lighting;
(viii) Appropriate drainage requirements and methods to manage stormwater runoff;
(ix) Public access to waterbodies, rivers, and streams; and
(x) Other requirements in connection with any use of land or structure;
(5) Permitting, prohibiting, limiting, and restricting development and redevelopment in
flood plains or flood hazard areas and designated significant natural areas;
(6) Promoting the conservation of energy and promoting energy-efficient patterns of
development and redevelopment;
LC000266 - Page 14 of 29

(7) Providing for the protection of existing and planned public drinking water supplies,
their tributaries and watersheds, and the protection of Narragansett Bay, its tributaries and
watershed;
(8) Providing for adequate, safe, and efficient transportation systems; and avoiding
congestion by relating types and levels of development and redevelopment to the capacity of the
circulation system, and maintaining a safe level of service of the system;
(9) Providing for the preservation and enhancement of the recreational resources of the city
or town;
(10) Promoting an economic climate that increases quality job opportunities and the overall
economic well-being of the city or town and the state;
(11) Providing for pedestrian transportation access to and between public and private
facilities, including, but not limited to, schools, employment centers, shopping areas, recreation
areas, and residences;
(12) Providing standards for, and requiring the provision of, adequate and properly
designed physical improvements, including plantings, and the proper maintenance of property;
(13) Permitting, prohibiting, limiting, and restricting land use in areas where development
and redevelopment is deemed to create a hazard to the public health or safety;
(14) Permitting, prohibiting, limiting, and restricting extractive industries and earth
removal and requiring restoration of land after these activities;
(15) Regulating sanitary landfill, except as otherwise provided by state statute;
(16) Permitting, prohibiting, limiting, and restricting signs and billboards and other outdoor
advertising devices;
(17) Designating airport hazard areas under the provisions of chapter 3 of title 1, and
enforcement of airport hazard area zoning regulations under the provisions established in that
chapter;
(18) Designating areas of historic, cultural, and/or archaeological value and regulating
development and redevelopment in those areas under the provisions of chapter 24.1 of this title;
(19) Providing standards and requirements for the regulation, review, and approval of any
proposed development and redevelopment in connection with those uses of land, buildings, or
structures specifically designated as subject to development plan review in a zoning ordinance;
(20) Designating special protection areas for water supply and limiting or prohibiting
development and redevelopment in these areas, except as otherwise provided by state statute;
(21) Specifying requirements for safe road access to developments and redevelopments
from existing streets, including limiting the number, design, and location of curb cuts, and
LC000266 - Page 15 of 29

provisions for internal circulation systems, including pedestrian and bicycle ways, for new
developments, and provisions for pedestrian and bicycle ways and redevelopment;
(22) Reducing unnecessary delay in approving or disapproving development applications
through provisions for preapplication conferences and other means;
(23) Providing for the application of the Rhode Island Fair Housing Practices Act, chapter
37 of title 34, the United States Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 (FHAA); the Rhode Island
Civil Rights of People with Disabilities Act, chapter 87 of title 42; and the Americans with
Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA), 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq.; and
(24) Regulating drive-through windows of varied intensity of use when associated with
land-use activities and providing standards and requirements for the regulation, review, and
approval of the drive-through windows, including, but not limited to:
(i) Identifying within which zoning districts drive-through windows may be permitted,
prohibited, or permitted by special-use permit;
(ii) Specifying requirements for adequate traffic circulation; and
(iii) Providing for adequate pedestrian safety and access, including issues concerning safety
and access for those with disabilities.
(b) A zoning ordinance may include special provisions for any or all of the following:
(1) Authorizing development incentives, including, but not limited to, additional permitted
uses, increased development and density, or additional design or dimensional flexibility in
exchange for:
(i) Increased open space;
(ii) Increased housing choices;
(iii) Traffic and pedestrian improvements;
(iv) Public and/or private facilities; and/or
(v) Other amenities as desired by the city or town and consistent with its comprehensive
plan. The provisions in the ordinance shall include maximum allowable densities of population
and/or intensities of use and shall indicate the type of improvements, amenities, and/or conditions.
Conditions may be made for donation in lieu of direct provisions for improvements or amenities;
(2) Establishing a system for transfer of development rights within or between zoning
districts designated in the zoning ordinance; and
(3) Regulating the development and redevelopment adjacent to designated scenic
highways, scenic waterways, major thoroughfares, public greenspaces, or other areas of special
public investment or valuable natural resources.
(c) Slope of land shall not be excluded from the calculation of the buildable lot area or the
LC000266 - Page 16 of 29

minimum lot size, or in the calculation of the number of buildable lots or units.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict a municipality’s right, within state
and local regulations, to establish its own minimum lot size per zoning district in its town or city.
45-24-34. General provisions — Purpose and consistency with comprehensive plan.
(a) A zoning ordinance adopted pursuant to this chapter shall provide a statement of its
purposes. Those purposes shall be consistent with § 45-24-30. A zoning ordinance adopted or
amended pursuant to this chapter shall include a statement that the zoning ordinance is consistent
with the comprehensive plan of the city or town adopted pursuant to chapter 22.2 of this title, or as
otherwise provided below and shall provide that in the instance of uncertainty in the construction
or application of any section of the ordinance, the ordinance shall be construed in a manner that
will further the implementation of, and not be contrary to, the goals and policies and applicable
elements of the comprehensive plan.
(b) The city or town shall bring the zoning ordinance or amendment into conformance with
its comprehensive plan as approved by the chief of the division of planning of the department of
administration or the superior court in accordance with its implementation schedule as set forth in
said plan, a period no longer than three (3) years. A zoning ordinance shall address and specify
requirements for the coordination between contiguous communities, the state, and other agencies,
as required by chapter 22.2 of this title.
45-24-36. General provisions — Division into districts.
A zoning ordinance divides a city or town into zoning use and form districts, which may
include overlay districts and floating zone districts, of the number, kind, type, shape, and area
suitable to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Regulations and standards shall be consistent for
each land use, type of development and redevelopment, or type of building or structure within a
district, but may differ from those in other districts. Zoning use and form districts shall be depicted
by type and location on the zoning map.
45-24-37. General provisions — Permitted uses.
(a) The zoning ordinance shall provide a listing of all land uses and/or performance
standards for uses that are permitted within the zoning use and form districts of the municipality.
The ordinance may provide for a procedure under which a proposed land use that is not specifically
listed may be presented by the property owner to the zoning board of review or to a local official
or agency charged with administration and enforcement of the ordinance for an evaluation and
determination of whether the proposed use is of a similar type, character, and intensity as a listed
permitted use. Upon such determination, the proposed use may be considered to be a permitted use.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the following uses are permitted
LC000266 - Page 17 of 29

uses within all residential zoning use and form districts of a municipality and all industrial and
commercial zoning use and form districts except where residential use is prohibited for public
health or safety reasons:
(1) Households;
(2) Community residences; and
(3) Family daycare homes.
(c) Any time a building or other structure used for residential purposes, or a portion of a
building containing residential units, is rendered uninhabitable by virtue of a casualty such as fire
or flood, the owner of the property is allowed to park, temporarily, mobile and manufactured home,
or homes, as the need may be, elsewhere upon the land, for use and occupancy of the former
occupants for a period of up to twelve (12) months, or until the building or structure is rehabilitated
and otherwise made fit for occupancy. The property owner, or a properly designated agent of the
owner, is only allowed to cause the mobile and manufactured home, or homes, to remain
temporarily upon the land by making timely application to the local building official for the
purposes of obtaining the necessary permits to repair or rebuild redevelop the structure.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, appropriate access for people with
disabilities to residential structures is allowed as a reasonable accommodation for any person(s)
residing, or intending to reside, in the residential structure.
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an accessory dwelling unit
(“ADU”) that meets the requirements of §§ 45-24-31 and 45-24-73(a) shall be a permitted use in
all residential zoning districts. An ADU that meets the requirements of §§ 45-24-31 and 45-24-
73(a) shall be permitted through an administrative building permit process only.
(f) When used in this section the terms “people with disabilities” or “member, or members,
with disabilities” means a person(s) who has a physical or mental impairment that substantially
limits one or more major life activities, as defined in 42-87-1(5).
(g) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, plant agriculture is a permitted
use within all zoning districts of a municipality, including all industrial and commercial zoning
districts, except where prohibited for public health or safety reasons or the protection of wildlife
habitat.
(h) Adaptive reuse. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, adaptive reuse
for the conversion of any commercial building, including offices, schools, religious facilities,
medical buildings, and malls into residential units or mixed-use developments which include the
development of at least fifty percent (50%) of the existing gross floor area into residential units,
shall be a permitted use and allowed by specific and objective provisions of a zoning ordinance,
LC000266 - Page 18 of 29

except where such is prohibited by environmental land use restrictions recorded on the property by
the state of Rhode Island department of environmental management or the United States
Environmental Protection Agency preventing the conversion to residential use.
(1) The specific zoning ordinance provisions for adaptive reuse shall exempt adaptive reuse
developments from off-street parking requirements of over one space per dwelling unit.
(2) Density.
(i) For projects that meet the following criteria, zoning ordinances shall allow for high
density development and shall not limit the density to less than fifteen (15) dwelling units per acre:
(A) Where the project is limited to the existing footprint, except that the footprint is allowed
to be expanded to accommodate upgrades related to the building and fire codes and utilities; and
(B) The development includes at least twenty percent (20%) low- and moderate-income
housing; and
(C) The development has access to public sewer and water service or has access to adequate
private water, such as a well and and/or wastewater treatment system(s) approved by the relevant
state agency for the entire development as applicable.
(ii) For all other adaptive reuse projects, the residential density permitted in the converted
structure shall be the maximum allowed that otherwise meets all standards of minimum housing
and has access to public sewer and water service or has access to adequate private water, such as a
well, and wastewater treatment system(s) approved by the relevant state agency for the entire
development, as applicable. The density proposed shall be determined to meet all public health and
safety standards.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, for adaptive reuse projects,
existing building setbacks shall remain and shall be considered legal nonconforming, but no
additional encroachments shall be permitted into any nonconforming setback, unless otherwise
allowed by zoning ordinance or relief is granted by the applicable authority.
(4) For adaptive reuse projects, notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the
height of the existing structure, if it exceeds the maximum height of the zoning district, may remain
and shall be considered legal nonconforming, and any rooftop construction shall be included within
the height exemption.
(i) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, all towns and cities may allow
manufactured homes that comply with § 23-27.3-109.1.3 as a type of single-family home on any
lot zoned for single-family use. Such home shall comply with all dimensional requirements of a
single-family home in the district or seek relief for the same under the provisions of this chapter.
45-24-39. General provisions — Nonconforming development.
LC000266 - Page 19 of 29

(a) Any city or town adopting or amending a zoning ordinance under this chapter shall
make provision for any use, activity, structure, building, or sign or other improvement, lawfully
existing at the time of the adoption or amendment of the zoning ordinance, but which is lawfully
established as nonconforming by use or nonconforming by dimension. The zoning ordinance may
regulate development which is nonconforming by dimension differently than that which is
nonconforming by use.
(b) The zoning ordinance shall permit the continuation of nonconforming development;
however, this does not prohibit the regulation of nuisances. The continuation of nonconforming
development shall only relate to zoning. It shall not be construed to provide any right to
continuation of non-compliance with building codes, any right to continuation of non-compliance
with the provisions of chapters 24.2 and 24.3 of title 45, any right to continuation of noncompliance
with the provisions of chapter 23 of title 46, or any right to continuation of noncompliance with
any regulations promulgated by the coastal resources management council.
(c) A zoning ordinance may shall provide that, if a nonconforming use is abandoned, it
may not be reestablished. Abandonment of a nonconforming use zoning use that raises pollution
risk consists of some overt act, or failure to act, which leads one to believe that the owner of the
nonconforming zoning use that raises pollution risk neither claims nor retains any interest in
continuing the nonconforming zoning use that raises pollution risk unless the owner can
demonstrate an intent not to abandon the zoning use that raises pollution risk. If any nonconforming
zoning use that raises pollution risk is halted for a period of three (3) years, the owner of the
nonconforming zoning use that raises pollution risk is presumed to have abandoned the
nonconforming zoning use that raises pollution risk, even if there is no intent to abandon the zoning
use that raises pollution risk. An involuntary interruption of nonconforming use, as by fire and
natural catastrophe, does not establish the intent to abandon the nonconforming use; however, if If
any nonconforming use is halted for a period of one year twenty (20) years, the owner of the
nonconforming use is presumed to have abandoned the nonconforming use, unless that presumption
is rebutted by the presentation of sufficient evidence of intent not to abandon the use. An
involuntary interruption of nonconforming use, as by fire and natural catastrophe, does not establish
the intent to abandon the nonconforming use. A use that is nonconforming by use because the
building or structure contains more dwelling units than are permitted by the use regulations of a
zoning ordinance shall never be considered abandoned, unless the zoning use and form district does
not permit any residential use.
(d) Abandonment of a nonconforming accessory use shall not be construed to imply
abandonment of other nonconforming uses of the site.
LC000266 - Page 20 of 29

(e) Although nonconformance by dimension shall never be deemed abandoned, the
non abandonment of nonconformance by dimension shall not be construed to imply
non abandonment of nonconforming uses of the site.
(f) In the event that a use that was previously not legally established as a nonconforming
use becomes legally established as a nonconforming use, or in the event that a preexisting use that
violated the zoning ordinance becomes a legal use due to changes in the zoning ordinance or state
law, the building official shall still be required to certify sufficient compliance with applicable
codes before the use is officially recorded as a legal use. However, the building official shall not
be permitted to levy any penalties or engage in any enforcement actions on the basis of any evidence
collected from an examination of the property for the purpose of assessing what alterations, if any,
would be necessary to achieve sufficient compliance to record the use as a legal use.
45-24-40. General provisions — Alteration of nonconforming development —
Alteration of uses established by variance or special use permit.
(a) A zoning ordinance may shall permit a nonconforming development to be altered under
either of the following conditions:
(1) The ordinance may establish a special-use permit, authorizing the alteration, which
must be approved by the zoning board of review following the procedure established in this chapter
and in the zoning ordinance; or
(2) The ordinance may shall allow the reconstruction, addition and enlargement, expansion,
intensification, or change in use, of nonconforming development either by permit or by right and
may distinguish between the foregoing actions by zoning districts.
(b) The ordinance may require that the alteration more closely adheres to the intent and
purposes of the zoning ordinance.
(c) A use established by variance or special use permit shall not acquire the rights of this
section, unless allowed by specific provisions of a municipal zoning ordinance.
45-24-43. General provisions — Special conditions.
In granting a variance or in making any determination upon which it is required to pass
after a public hearing under a zoning ordinance, the zoning board of review or other zoning
enforcement agency may apply the special conditions that may, in the opinion of the board or
agency, be required to promote the intent and purposes of the comprehensive plan and the zoning
ordinance of the city or town. Failure to abide by any special conditions attached to a grant
constitutes a zoning violation. Those special conditions shall be based on competent credible
evidence on the record, be incorporated into the decision, and may include, but are not limited to,
provisions for:
LC000266 - Page 21 of 29

(1) Minimizing the adverse impact of the development or redevelopment upon other land,
including the type, intensity, design, and performance of activities;
(2) Controlling the sequence of development, including when it must be commenced and
completed;
(3) Controlling the duration of use or development or redevelopment and the time within
which any temporary structure must be removed;
(4) Assuring satisfactory installation and maintenance of required public improvements;
(5) Designating the exact location and nature of development or redevelopment; and
(6) Establishing detailed records by submission of drawings, maps, plats, or specifications.
45-24-44. General provisions — Creation of vested rights.
(a) A zoning ordinance provides protection for the consideration of applications for
development or redevelopment that are substantially complete and have been submitted for
approval to the appropriate review agency in the city or town prior to enactment of the new zoning
ordinance or amendment.
(b) Zoning ordinances or other land development ordinances or regulations specify the
minimum requirements for a development application to be substantially complete for the purposes
of this section.
(c) Any application considered by a city or town under the protection of this section shall
be reviewed according to the regulations applicable in the zoning ordinance in force at the time the
application was submitted.
(d) If an application for development or redevelopment under the provisions of this section
is approved, reasonable time limits shall be set within which development or redevelopment of the
property must begin and within which development or redevelopment must be substantially
completed.
45-24-46.1. Inclusionary zoning.
(a) A zoning ordinance requiring the inclusion of affordable housing as part of a
development or redevelopment shall provide that the housing will be affordable housing, as defined
in § 42-128-8.1(d)(1); that the affordable housing will constitute not less than fifteen percent (15%)
of the total units proposed for the development or redevelopment; and that the units will remain
affordable for a period of not less than thirty (30) years from initial occupancy enforced through a
land lease and/or deed restriction enforceable by the municipality and the state of Rhode Island. A
zoning ordinance that requires the inclusion of affordable housing as part of a development or
redevelopment shall specify the threshold in which the inclusion of affordable housing is required,
but in no event shall a minimum threshold triggering the inclusion of affordable housing be higher
LC000266 - Page 22 of 29

than ten (10) dwelling units. The total number of units for the development may include less than
fifteen percent (15%) affordable units after the density bonus described in subsection (c) of this
section is determined.
(b) A zoning ordinance that includes inclusionary zoning may provide that the affordable
housing must be built on-site or it may allow for one or more alternative methods of production,
including, but not limited to: off-site construction or rehabilitation; donation of land suitable for
development or redevelopment of the required affordable units; and/or the payment of a fee in lieu
of the construction or provision of affordable housing units.
(c) Density bonus, zoning incentives, and municipal subsidies. For all projects subject
to inclusionary zoning, subject to applicable setback, lot width, or frontage requirements or the
granting of relief from the same, a municipality shall allow the addition of one market rate unit for
each affordable unit required and the minimum lot area per dwelling unit normally required in the
applicable zoning district shall be reduced by that amount necessary to accommodate the
development. Larger density bonuses for the provision of an increased percentage of affordable
housing in a development or redevelopment may be provided by a municipality in the zoning
ordinance. The total number of units for the development or redevelopment shall equal the number
originally proposed, including the required affordable units, plus the additional units that constitute
the density bonus. Local regulations shall provide for reasonable relief from dimensional
requirements to accommodate the bonus density under this section. A municipality shall provide,
and an applicant may request, additional zoning incentives and/or municipal government subsidies
as defined in § 45-53-3 to offset differential costs of affordable units. Available zoning incentives
and municipal government subsidies may be listed in the zoning ordinance, but shall not be an
exclusive list.
(d) Fee-in-lieu. To the extent a municipality provides an option for the payment of a fee-
in-lieu of the construction or provision of affordable housing, and an application seeks to utilize
fee-in-lieu, the use of such fee shall be the choice of the developer or builder applied on a per-unit
basis and may be used for new developments or redevelopments, purchasing property and/or
homes, rehabilitating properties, or any other manner that creates additional low- or moderate-
income housing as defined in § 45-53-3(9).
(1) Eligibility for density bonus. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, an
application that utilizes a fee-in-lieu, off-site construction or rehabilitation, or donation of land
suitable for development or redevelopment of the required affordable units shall not be eligible for
the density bonus outlined in this section.
(2) An application that seeks to utilize a fee-in-lieu of the construction or provision of
LC000266 - Page 23 of 29

affordable housing must be reviewed by the planning board or commission and is not eligible for
administrative review under the Rhode Island Land Development and Subdivision Review
Enabling Act of 1992, codified at §§ 45-23-25 — 45-23-74.
(3) Amount of fee-in-lieu. For affordable single-family homes and condominium units, the
per-unit fee shall be the difference between the maximum affordable sales price for a family of four
(4) earning eighty percent (80%) of the area median income as determined annually by the U.S.
Department of Housing and Urban Development and the average cost of developing a single unit
of affordable housing. The average cost of developing a single unit of affordable housing shall be
determined annually based on the average, per-unit development or redevelopment cost of
affordable homes financed by Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation (RIHMFC)
over the previous three (3) years, excluding existing units that received preservation financing.
(i) Notwithstanding subsection (d)(3) of this section, in no case shall the per-unit fee for
affordable single family homes and condominium units be less than forty thousand dollars
($40,000).
(4) Use of fee-in-lieu. The municipality shall deposit all in-lieu payments into restricted
accounts that shall be allocated and spent only for the creation and development or redevelopment
of affordable housing within the municipality serving individuals or families at or below eighty
percent (80%) of the area median income. The municipality shall maintain a local affordable
housing board to oversee the funds in the restricted accounts and shall allocate the funds within
three (3) years of collection. The municipality shall include in the housing element of their local
comprehensive plan and shall pass by ordinance, the process it will use to allocate the funds.
(e) As an alternative to the provisions of subsection (d), the municipality may elect to
transfer in-lieu payments promptly upon receipt or within the three-year (3) period after receipt. A
municipality shall transfer all fee-in-lieu payments that are not allocated within three (3) years of
collection, including funds held as of July 1, 2024, to RIHMFC for the purpose of developing
affordable housing within that community.
(f) Both the municipalities and RIHMFC shall report annually with the first report due
December 31, 2024, to the general assembly, the secretary of housing, and the housing resources
commission the amount of fees in lieu collected by community, the projects that were provided
funding with the fees, the dollar amounts allocated to the projects, and the number of units created.
45-24-46.2. Special provisions — Transfer of development rights — North Kingstown.
(a) In addition to other powers granted to towns and cities by this chapter to establish and
administer transfer of development rights programs, the town council of the town of North
Kingstown may provide by ordinance for the transfer of development rights, as a voluntary program
LC000266 - Page 24 of 29

available to developers and property owners, in the manner set forth in this section.
(b) The establishment, as provided for by this section, of a system for transfer of
development rights within or between zoning districts, or a portion thereof, designated in the zoning
ordinance shall be:
(1) For the purpose of providing developers and property owners the ability to establish,
certify, purchase, sell, convey, and/or hold land development rights; and
(2) For one or more of the following purposes:
(i) Preserving sensitive resource areas in the community such as groundwater reserves,
wildlife habitat, agricultural lands, and public access to surface waters;
(ii) Directing development away from sensitive resource areas to places better suited to
increased levels of development and redevelopment such as established or proposed mixed use,
commercial, village, or residential centers;
(iii) Directing development to areas served by existing infrastructure such as established
roadways, public water supply systems, centralized sewer collection systems, public transit and
other utilities; or
(iv) Shaping and balancing urban and rural development; and/or promoting a high level of
quality in design in the development and redevelopment of private and public facilities and spaces.
(c) For purposes of this section the following terms shall have the following meaning:
(1) “Receiving area district” means a zoning district, which is established and mapped
pursuant to a transfer of development rights ordinance and superimposed on one or more zoning
use districts or portions thereof that is eligible to receive development rights through a major land
development project review. As may be necessary or desirable to achieve the intended uses, density
and intensity of use, a receiving area district may allow for additional development and
redevelopment capacity and for increased lot building coverage and building envelope that are
greater than those of the underlying zoning.
(2) “Sending area district” means a zoning district, which is established and mapped
pursuant to a transfer of development rights ordinance and superimposed on one or more zoning
use and form districts or a portion thereof, that is eligible to establish development rights that may
eventually be transferred to a receiving area.
45-24-46.3. Special provisions — Transfer of development rights — Exeter.
(a) In addition to other powers granted to towns and cities by this chapter to establish and
administer transfer of development rights programs, the town council of the town of Exeter may
provide by ordinance for the transfer of development rights, as a voluntary program available to
developers and property owners, in the manner set forth in this section.
LC000266 - Page 25 of 29

(b) For purposes of this section the following terms shall have the following meaning:
(1) “Receiving area district” means a zoning district, which is established and mapped
pursuant to a transfer of development rights ordinance and superimposed on one or more zoning
use and form districts or portions thereof, that is eligible to receive development rights through a
major land development project review. As may be necessary or desirable to achieve the intended
uses, density and intensity of use, a receiving area district may allow for additional development
capacity and for increased lot building coverage and building envelope that are greater than those
of the underlying zoning.
(2) “Sending area district” means a zoning district, which is established and mapped
pursuant to a transfer of development rights ordinance and superimposed on one or more zoning
use and form districts or a portion thereof, that is eligible to establish development rights that may
eventually be transferred to a receiving area.
(c) The establishment, as provided for by this section, of a system for transfer of
development rights within or between zoning districts, or a portion thereof, designated in the zoning
ordinance shall be:
(1) For the purpose of providing developers and property owners the ability to establish,
certify, purchase, sell, convey, and/or hold land development rights; and
(2) For one or more of the following purposes:
(i) Preserving sensitive resource areas in the community such as groundwater reserves,
wildlife habitat, agricultural lands, and public access to surface waters;
(ii) Directing development away from sensitive resource areas to places better suited to
increased levels of development and redevelopment such as established or proposed mixed use,
commercial, village, or residential centers;
(iii) Directing development to areas served by existing infrastructure such as established
roadways, public water supply systems, centralized sewer collection systems, public transit and
other utilities; or
(iv) Shaping and balancing urban and rural development, and/or promoting a high level of
quality in design in the development and redevelopment of private and public facilities and spaces.
45-24-47. Special provisions — Land development projects.
(a) A zoning ordinance shall provide for land development projects which are defined in §
45-23-32.
(b) A zoning ordinance adopted pursuant to this chapter that permits or requires the creation
of land development projects in one or more zoning districts shall require that any land development
project shall be reviewed, in accordance with the procedures established by chapter 23 of this title,
LC000266 - Page 26 of 29

including those for appeal and judicial review, and with any ordinances or regulations adopted
pursuant to the procedures, whether or not the land development project constitutes a “subdivision,”
as defined in chapter 23 of this title. No land development project shall be initiated until a plan of
the project has been submitted and approval has been granted by the authorized permitting
authority. In reviewing, hearing, and deciding upon a land development project, the authorized
permitting authority may be empowered to allow zoning incentives within the project; provided,
that standards for the zoning incentives are described in the zoning ordinance, and may be
empowered to apply any special conditions and stipulations to the approval that may, in the opinion
of the authorized permitting authority, be required to maintain harmony with neighboring uses and
promote the objectives and purposes of the comprehensive plan and zoning ordinance.
(c) In regulating land development projects, an ordinance adopted pursuant to this chapter
may include, but is not limited to, regulations governing the following:
(1) A minimum area or site size for a land development project;
(2) Uses to be permitted within the development;
(3) Ratios of residential to nonresidential uses where applicable;
(4) Maximum density per lot and maximum density for the entire development;
(5) Roads, driveways, utilities, parking, and other facilities; regulations may distinguish
between those facilities intended to remain in private ownership or to be dedicated to the public;
and
(6) Buffer areas, landscaping, screening, and shading.
(d) In regulating land development projects, an ordinance adopted pursuant to this chapter
shall include provisions for zoning incentives that include the adjustment of applicable lot density
and dimensional standards where open space is to be permanently set aside for public or common
use, and/or where the physical characteristics, location, or size of the site require an adjustment,
and/or where the location, size, and type of housing, commercial, industrial, or other use require an
adjustment, and/or where housing for low and moderate income families is to be provided, or where
other amenities not ordinarily required are provided, as stipulated in the zoning ordinance.
Provision may be made for adjustment of applicable lot density and dimensional standards for
payment or donation of other land or facilities in lieu of an on-site provision of an amenity that
would, if provided on-site, enable an adjustment.
(e)(1) A zoning ordinance requiring open land in a cluster development or other land
development project for public or common use, shall provide that such open land either: (i) Be
conveyed to the city or town and accepted by it for park, open space, agricultural, or other specified
use or uses; or (ii) Be conveyed to a nonprofit organization, the principal purpose of which is the
LC000266 - Page 27 of 29

conservation of open space or resource protection; or (iii) Be conveyed to a corporation or trust
owned or to be owned by the owners of lots or units within the development or redevelopment, or
owners of shares within a cooperative development or redevelopment. If such a corporation or trust
is used, ownership shall pass with conveyances of the lots or units; or (iv) Remain in private
ownership if the use is limited to agriculture, habitat or forestry, and the city or town has set forth
in its community comprehensive plan and zoning ordinance that private ownership is necessary for
the preservation and management of the agricultural, habitat or forest resources.
(2) In any case where the land is not conveyed to the city or town:
(i) A restriction, in perpetuity, enforceable by the city or town or by any owner of property
in the cluster or other land development project in which the land is located shall be recorded
providing that the land is kept in the authorized condition(s) and not built upon or developed for
accessory uses such as parking or roadway; and
(ii) The developmental rights and other conservation easements on the land may be held,
in perpetuity, by a nonprofit organization, the principal purpose of which is the conservation of
open space or resource protection.
(3) All open space land provided by a cluster development or other land development
project shall be subject to a community-approved management plan that will specify the permitted
uses for the open space.
45-24-48. Special provisions — Preapplication conference.
A zoning ordinance may provide for a preapplication conference for specific types of
development and redevelopment proposals. A preapplication conference is intended to allow the
designated agency to:
(1) Acquaint the applicant with the comprehensive plan and any specific plans that apply
to the parcel, as well as the zoning and other ordinances that affect the proposed development or
redevelopment;
(2) Suggest improvements to the proposed design on the basis of a review of the sketch
plan;
(3) Advise the applicant to consult appropriate authorities on the character and placement
of public utility services; and
(4) Help the applicant to understand the steps to be taken to receive approval.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000266
========
LC000266 - Page 28 of 29